Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.370

Nonresident pharmacies—License required—Application—Renewal.

(1) A nonresident pharmacy that has not obtained a license from the department of health shall not conduct the business of selling or distributing drugs in this state.

(2) Applications for a nonresident pharmacy license under RCW 18.64.350 through 18.64.400 shall be made on a form furnished by the department. The department may require such information as it deems is reasonably necessary to carry out the purpose of RCW 18.64.350 through 18.64.400.

(3) The nonresident pharmacy license shall be renewed annually on a date to be established by the department by rule. In the event the license fee remains unpaid, no renewal or new license shall be issued except upon payment of the license renewal fee and a penalty fee equal to the original license fee.

[ 1991 c 87 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1991 c 87: See note following RCW 18.64.350.